Utah statutes.
63B-16-401.   Authorizations to acquire, sell, lease, or exchange property.

(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Southeast Applied Technology Campus of the Utah College of Applied Technology and the College of Eastern Utah may cooperatively enter into negotiations with a nonstate entity and complete a real property exchange to acquire an applied technology facility in Price;

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project; and

(c)  the college may request state funds for operations and maintenance costs and capital improvements to the extent that the college is able to demonstrate to the Board of Regents that the facility meets approved academic and training purposes under Board of Regents policy R710.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Mountainland Applied Technology Campus of the Utah College of Applied Technology may exercise its option to purchase additional property in northern Utah County adjacent to property purchased with the appropriation in Chapter 367, Item 41, Laws of Utah 2006;

(b)  the purchase be financed through donations, institutional funds, a land exchange involving Lehi City and the Utah Transit Authority, or some combination of donations, institutional funds, and a land exchange involving Lehi City and the Utah Transit Authority for future development of a commuter rail station;

(c)  the purchase be conducted under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management; and

(d)  no state funds be used for any portion of this purchase.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Department of Human Services Complex located at 120 North 200 West, Salt Lake City, Utah be sold for $11,000,000;

(b)  that the proceeds from the sale be used to:

(i)  payoff the outstanding bond on the Human Services Complex;

(ii)  purchase the Brigham Young University Salt Lake Center located at 3760 South Highland Drive, Salt Lake City, Utah for up to $6,000,000 for occupancy by the Utah State Board of Education Schools for the Deaf and Blind; and

(iii)  the remaining funds be used to remodel the Salt Lake Center; and

(c)  the Division of Facilities, Construction and Management enter into a lease with the buyer of the Human Services Complex for and on behalf of the Department of Human Services that allows the Department of Human Services to continue to occupy the complex for the period of time needed for the state to purchase, construct, or lease a replacement facility for the Department of Human Services.



Enacted by Chapter 174, 2007 General Session

